Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 12

Conveyances

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Cross References.

Deeds recorded in recorder's office, §14-15-401 et seq.

Records where multiple judicial districts, §14-15-901.

Validation of deeds, §16-47-108.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1917, No. 332, § 2: Mar. 24, 1917. Emergency declared.

18-12-101. Definition and applicability.

(a)

The term “real estate” as used in this act shall be construed as co-extensive in meaning with “lands, tenements, and hereditaments” and as embracing all chattels real.

(b)

This act shall not be construed so as to embrace last wills and testaments.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 31, §§ 7, 8; C. & M. Dig., §§ 1501, 1502; Pope's Dig., §§ 1810, 1811; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 50-409, 50-410.

Meaning of “this act”.

Rev. Stat., ch. 31, codified as §§16-47-101,16-47-103 —16-47-106,16-47-110,18-12-101,18-12-102,18-12-104,18-12-105,18-12-201,18-12-203 —18-12-206,18-12-209,18-12-301,18-12-402,18-12-501,18-12-502,18-12-601 —18-12-603.

18-12-102. Transfer by deed — Warranty.

(a)

All lands, tenements, and hereditaments may be aliened and possession thereof transferred by deed without livery of seizin.

(b)

The words, “grant, bargain and sell” shall be an express covenant to the grantee, his or her heirs, and assigns that the grantor is seized of an indefeasible estate in fee simple, free from encumbrance done or suffered from the grantor, except rents or services that may be expressly reserved by the deed, as also for the quiet enjoyment thereof against the grantor, his or her heirs, and assigns and from the claim and demand of all other persons whatever, unless limited by express words in the deed.

(c)

The grantee, his or her heirs, or assigns, may, in any action, assign breaches as if such covenants were expressly inserted.

(d)

As between the grantor and grantee, neither the statutory nor general express covenant of warranty against encumbrances shall be held to cover any taxes or assessments of any improvement district of any kind, whether formed under general statutes authorizing the assessment of lands for local improvements of any kind or whether the improvement district is formed by public or private act of the General Assembly. The lien for any such local assessment or tax shall run with the land and be assumed by the grantee, and the grantee shall pay any and all installments of the tax or assessment becoming due after the execution and delivery of the deed, unless otherwise expressly provided.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 31, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1917, No. 332, § 1, p. 1671; C. & M. Dig., §§ 1495, 1496; Pope's Dig., §§ 1795, 1796; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 50-401, 50-402.

18-12-103. Restrictive covenants — Definition.

(a)

As used in this section, “restrictive covenant” means a restriction on the use or development of real property regardless of whether the restriction is created by a covenant in a deed or bill of assurance, or by any other instrument.

(b)

An instrument creating a restrictive covenant is not effective to restrict the use or development of real property unless the instrument purporting to restrict the use or development of the real property is executed by the owners of the real property and recorded in the office of the recorder of the county in which the property is located.

(c)

If the instrument creating a restrictive covenant contains separate sections stating the duration of the covenant and the requirements for amending the covenant, the section or sections stating the duration of the covenant shall be read independently of the section or sections stating the requirements for amending the covenant so that the duration of the covenant does not limit the ability to amend a restrictive covenant at any time.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 395, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-427; Acts 2011, No. 185, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2011, No. 185, § 1, provided:

“Findings and legislative intent.

“(a)

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

The decision of the Arkansas Court of Appeals in Rausch Coleman Homes, LLC v. Brech, 2009 Ark. App. 225, 303 S.W.3d 456 (Ark. App. 2009) unduly restricts the use and development of real property; and

“(2)

It is in the best interests of the people of the State of Arkansas to foster the ability of landowners to amend private covenants to obtain the best possible use of the landowners' real property.

“(b)

It is the intent of the General Assembly by passing this act to encourage and promote the use and economic development of land in the State of Arkansas by clarifying the requirements for amending covenants restricting the use or development of real property.”

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment rewrote the section.

Subdivisions.

Restrictive covenants pertaining to a subdivision were neither valid nor effective where only one of several property owners signed the restrictive covenants document. Forrest Constr., Inc. v. Milam, 345 Ark. 1, 43 S.W.3d 140 (2001).

Cited:

Ray v. Miller, 323 Ark. 578, 916 S.W.2d 117 (1996).

18-12-104. Execution of deeds.

Deeds and instruments of writing for the conveyance of real estate shall be executed in the presence of two (2) disinterested witnesses or, in default thereof, shall be acknowledged by the grantor in the presence of two (2) such witnesses, who shall then subscribe the deed or instrument in writing for the conveyance of the real estate. When the witnesses do not subscribe the deed or instrument of writing as described in this section at the time of the execution thereof, the date of their subscribing it shall be stated with their signatures.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 31, § 12; C. & M. Dig., § 1515; Pope's Dig., § 1824; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-417.

18-12-105. Estate of fee simple presumed.

The term “heirs”, or other words of inheritance, shall not be necessary to create or convey an estate in fee simple, but all deeds shall be construed to convey a complete estate of inheritance in fee simple unless expressly limited by appropriate words in the deed.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 31, § 3; C. & M. Dig., § 1497; Pope's Dig., § 1797; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-403.

18-12-106. Joint tenants with right of survivorship.

(a)

Interests in real property may be conveyed to two (2) or more persons, regardless of their relationship to each other, as joint tenants with right of survivorship.

(b)

Any person who owns an interest in real property may convey that interest or any portion thereof to himself or herself and one (1) or more other persons, regardless of their relationship to each other, as joint tenants with right of survivorship.

(c)

Furthermore, all conveyances of real property made prior to July 15, 1991, and which clearly intended that the interests were conveyed as joint tenancy with right of survivorship even though the grantees were not husband and wife shall be deemed to have created joint tenancies with right of survivorship.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 56, § 1.

18-12-107. Transfer fee covenants prohibited — Definitions.

(a)

As used in this section:

(1)

“Association” means a nonprofit, mandatory-membership organization:

(A)

Comprised of owners of homes, condominiums, units in a horizontal property regime, cooperatives, manufactured homes, or any other interest in real property; and

(B)

Created pursuant to declaration, covenant, bill of assurance, master deed, or other applicable law;

(2)

“Licensee” means a licensee as defined in §17-42-103;

(3)

“Transfer” means the sale, gift, grant, conveyance, assignment, inheritance, or other transfer of an ownership interest in real property located in this state;

(4)(A)

“Transfer fee” means a fee or charge that obligates a transferee or transferor of real property to pay a fee or charge to a third person:

(i)

Upon a transfer of an interest in the real property; or

(ii)

For permitting the transfer.

(B)

“Transfer fee” does not include a tax, assessment, fee, or charge imposed by a governmental authority under applicable law; and

(5)(A)

“Transfer fee covenant” means a provision in a recorded document or an unrecorded document imposing a transfer fee that purports to run with the land or bind current owners or successors in title to real property located in this state.

(B)

“Transfer fee covenant” includes a lien or claim of lien to secure payment of a transfer fee.

(C)

“Transfer fee covenant” does not include a provision:

(i)

Of a purchase contract, option, mortgage, security agreement, real property listing agreement, or other agreement that obligates a party to the agreement to pay another party to the agreement as full or partial consideration for the agreement or for a waiver of rights under the agreement an amount determined by the agreement if the amount is:

(a)

Payable on a one-time basis only upon the next transfer of an interest in the specified real property and, once paid, shall not bind successors in title to the property;

(b)

A loan assumption fee or other fee charged in connection with a transfer by a lender holding or obtaining a lien on the transferred real property; or

(c)

A fee or commission paid to a licensee for services rendered in connection with a transfer of the property for which the fee or commission is paid;

(ii)

In a deed, memorandum, or other document recorded for the purpose of providing record notice of an agreement described in subdivision (a)(5)(C)(i) of this section;

(iii)

Of a document requiring payment of a fee or charge to an association to be used exclusively for the purposes authorized in the document, as long as no portion of the fee is required to be passed through to a third party designated or identifiable by description in the document or another document referenced in the document; or

(iv)

Of a document affecting real property that requires payment of a fee or charge to an organization described in § 501(c)(3) or § 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code as it existed on January 1, 2011, to be used exclusively to support:

(a)

Cultural, educational, charitable, recreational, environmental, conservational, or other similar activities benefiting the real property; or

(b)

The community in which the property is located.

(b)(1)

A transfer fee covenant recorded with respect to real property in this state after July 27, 2011:

(A)

Does not run with the title to the real property; and

(B)

Is not binding upon or enforceable at law or in equity against:

(i)

The real property; or

(ii)

A subsequent owner, purchaser, or mortgagee of an interest in the real property.

(2)

This section does not validate a transfer fee covenant recorded in this state before July 27, 2011.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 145, § 1.

U.S. Code.

Sections 501(c)(3) and 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue, referred to in this section, are codified as 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) and (4).

18-12-108. Scrivener's affidavits — Definition.

(a)

As used in this section, “scrivener's affidavit” means a sworn and acknowledged affidavit relating to:

(1)

The identification, marital status, heirship, relation, death, or the time of death of a person who is a party to an instrument affecting the title to real property;

(2)

The identification of a corporation or other legal entity that is a party to an instrument affecting the title to real property; or

(3)

The legal description to real property.

(b)

A scrivener's affidavit may be executed and recorded by a:

(1)

Licensed attorney who prepared the original instrument;

(2)

Licensed attorney who represents a party to the original instrument;

(3)

Party to the original instrument if the party prepared the original instrument; or

(4)

Current employee of a title company that completed the form of the original instrument.

(c)

A scrivener's affidavit shall:

(1)

Be sworn to and acknowledged before a person authorized to administer an oath under the laws of this state;

(2)

Conspicuously identify in its title that it is a “Scrivener's Affidavit”; and

(3)

Contain the following information concerning the original instrument:

(A)

The name of the person or entity that completed or prepared the original instrument;

(B)

The names of all parties to the original instrument;

(C)

The recording information, including the recording date of the original instrument; and

(D)

A brief description of each error that the scrivener's affidavit is designed to correct.

(d)

A scrivener's affidavit may be prepared in substantially the following form:

“SCRIVENER'S ERROR AFFIDAVIT
KNOW ALL PERSONS BY THESE PRESENTS that:
[Name]
prepared or completed the form of a
[Type of instrument]
with regard to a conveyance from
[Name(s)]
as
[grantor, mortgagor, etc.]
to
[Name(s)]
as
[grantee, mortgagee, etc.] . The
[Type of instrument]
which was recorded in the records of
County, Arkansas, on
[Date] , as Instrument Number
[in Book
at Page
]
contained a scrivener's error with regard to the
[reason for correction(s)] .
The aforementioned
[Type of instrument]
should reflect that the
[Type of instrument]
read as follows:
[Insert correction(s)] .
Further affiant sayeth naught.
WITNESS my hand and seal on this
day of
, 20 .
[Signature] Name printed: ACKNOWLEDGMENT
STATE OF
}
}ss. COUNTY OF
}
On this day of
day of
, 20 , before me, a Notary Public in and for the said county and state, personally appeared
, to me well known, and acknowledged that [he/she] had executed the foregoing document for the consideration, uses, and purposes therein mentioned and set forth.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, I hereunto set my hand and official seal.
Notary Public
My Commission Expires:

Click to view form.

(e)

A scrivener's affidavit that complies with this section in substantially the form provided by subsection (d) of this section or in a custom form shall be:

(1)

Recorded by the county recorder in the land records of the county where the real property is located;

(2)

Indexed by the county recorder in the general index under the names of the original parties to the instrument as they are identified in the scrivener's affidavit; and

(3)

Admissible as evidence to the same extent as a deed or other instrument recorded pursuant to §18-12-201 et seq. in an action involving the instrument to which it relates or the title to the real property affected by the instrument.

(f)(1)

Except as provided in subdivisions (f)(2) and (3) of this section, notice of the corrective information provided by the scrivener's affidavit is effective at the time the scrivener's affidavit is recorded.

(2)

If an error contained in a scrivener's affidavit is of an obvious nature, notice of the corrective information provided by the scrivener's affidavit is effective at the time the original instrument being corrected was recorded.

(3)

Subdivision (f)(2) of this section does not apply to a bona fide purchaser for value of real property.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1045, § 1.

Subchapter 2

— Acknowledgment and Proof of Instruments

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter and §16-47-201 et seq. provide alternative methods of taking acknowledgments; therefore, acknowledgments taken under either this subchapter or §16-47-201 et seq. are valid. See Rumph v. Lester Land Co., 205 Ark. 1147, 172 S.W.2d 916 (1943).

The provisions of this subchapter are also codified as §§16-47-101 —16-47-108,16-47-110.

Cross References.

Uniform act constitutes an alternative method of taking acknowledgments, §16-47-217.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1874, No. 13, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1887, No. 91, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1899, No. 150, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1921, No. 233, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1923, No. 464, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1955, No. 101, § 5: Feb. 23, 1955. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly finds it to be a fact, and so declares, that many instruments contain defective acknowledgments due to errors in the preparation thereof, without fault upon the part of the person, firm or corporation so executing said instruments; that these defective acknowledgments hamper the sale of real estate throughout the State and retard the development of industries and other businesses in the State of Arkansas; that this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 714, § 75: Mar. 25, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is declared by the General Assembly of Arkansas that existing law relating to such matters as homestead, dower, curtesy, statutory allowances payable from a decedent's estate, and the right of a surviving spouse to take against the will of a decedent, do not in all circumstances provide for equal treatment between the sexes, that the constitutionality of such existing law has been drawn into question by decisions of the United States Supreme Court and the Arkansas Supreme Court, and that there is an urgent need to insure that the law provides equality in the property rights and interests of married persons. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

Acts 2013, No. 999, § 6: Apr. 8, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that many instruments affecting
title to real estate are being found to not provide constructive notice because of defects in the certificates of acknowledgment; and that this act is immediately necessary to protect property rights and interests. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

18-12-201. Proof or acknowledgment as prerequisite to recording real estate conveyances.

All deeds and other instruments in writing for the conveyance of any real estate, or by which any real estate may be affected in law or equity, shall be proven or duly acknowledged in conformity with the provisions of this act before they or any of them shall be admitted to record.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 31, § 22; C. & M. Dig., § 1525; Pope's Dig., § 1835; A.S.A. 1947, § 49-211.

Publisher's Notes.

Rev. Stat., ch. 31, § 22, is also codified as §16-47-101.

Meaning of “this act”.

Rev. Stat., ch. 31, codified as §§16-47-101,16-47-103 —16-47-106,16-47-110,18-12-101,18-12-102,18-12-104,18-12-105,18-12-201,18-12-203 —18-12-206,18-12-209,18-12-301,18-12-402,18-12-501,18-12-502,18-12-601 —18-12-603.

18-12-202. Forms of acknowledgments — Validity — Acknowledgments of married persons.

(a)(1)

Either the forms of acknowledgments now in use in this state or any other forms may be used in the case of all deeds and other instruments in writing for the conveyance of real or personal property which:

(A)

Specify, in the caption or otherwise, the state and county or other place where the acknowledgment is taken;

(B)

Set out the name of the person acknowledging and, in instances in which he or she acknowledges otherwise than in his or her own right, the name of the person, association, or corporation for which he or she acknowledges; and

(C)

Recite in substance or the equivalent that the execution of the instrument was acknowledged by the person so named as acknowledging, or any other form of acknowledgment provided by law.

(2)

These forms may also be used when the property is to be affected in law or equity and also in any other case in which such an acknowledgment is for any purpose required or authorized by law.

(3)

An acknowledgment in any of these forms shall be sufficient to entitle the instrument to be recorded and to be read in evidence.

(b)

The acknowledgment of a married person, both as to the disposition of his or her own property and as to the relinquishment of dower, curtesy, and homestead in the property of a spouse, may be made in the same form as if that person were sole and without any examination separate and apart from a spouse, and without necessity for a specific reference therein to the interest so conveyed or relinquished.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 44, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 1831; Acts 1981, No. 714, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 49-201.

18-12-203. Officers authorized to take proof or acknowledgment of real estate conveyances.

(a)

The proof or acknowledgment of every deed or instrument of writing for the conveyance of any real estate shall be taken by one (1) of the following courts or officers:

(1)

When acknowledged or proved within this state, before the Supreme Court, the circuit court, or any justices or judges thereof, the clerk of any court of record, any county judge, or before any notary public;

(2)

When acknowledged or proved outside this state, and within the United States or its territories, or in any of the colonies or possessions or dependencies of the United States, before any court of the United States, or any state or territory, or colony or possession or dependency of the United States, having a seal, or a clerk of any such court, or before any notary public, or before the mayor of any incorporated city or town, or the chief officer of any city or town having a seal, or before a commissioner appointed by the Governor; and

(3)

When acknowledged or proved outside the United States, before any:

(A)

Court of any state, kingdom, or empire having a seal;

(B)

Mayor or chief officer of any city or town having an official seal; or

(C)

Officer of any foreign country who by the laws of that country is authorized to take probate of the conveyance of real estate of his or her own country if the officer has, by law, an official seal.

(b)

The acknowledgment of any deed or mortgage, when taken outside the United States, may be taken and certified by a United States consul.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 31, § 13; Acts 1874, No. 13, § 1, p. 58; 1887, No. 91, § 1, p. 142; 1897, No. 26, § 1, p. 33; 1899, No. 150, § 1, p. 276; C. & M. Dig., § 1516; Acts 1921, No. 233, § 1; 1923, No. 464, §§ 1, 2; Pope's Dig., § 1825; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 49-202, 49-203; Acts 2003, No. 1185, § 252.

Publisher's Notes.

As to validation of prior acknowledgments, see Acts 1873, No. 36, § 2; Acts 1874, No. 13, § 2; Acts 1897, No. 26, § 2; Acts 1899, No. 150, § 2.

Rev. Stat., ch. 31, § 13, as amended, is also codified as §16-47-103.

Amendments.

The 2003 amendment, in (a), deleted “the chancery court,” following “the circuit court,” deleted “or probate” following “any county” and deleted “justice of the peace or” preceding “notary public.”

Cross References.

Commissioners in other states may take acknowledgments, §25-16-204.

18-12-204. Attestation of acknowledgments.

(a)

In cases of acknowledgment or proof of deeds or conveyances of real estate taken within the United States or territories thereof, when taken before any court or officer having a seal of office, the deed or conveyance shall be attested under the seal of office. If the officer has no seal of office, then it shall be attested under the official signature of the officer.

(b)

In all cases of deeds and conveyances proved or acknowledged outside the United States or their territories, the acknowledgment or proof must be attested under the official seal of the court or officer before whom the probate is had.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 31, §§ 14, 15; C. & M. Dig., §§ 1517, 1518; Pope's Dig., §§ 1826, 1827; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 49-204, 49-205.

Publisher's Notes.

Rev. Stat., ch. 31, §§ 14 and 15, are also codified as §16-47-104.

18-12-205. Certificate of acknowledgment.

(a)

Any court or officer that takes a proof or an acknowledgment of any instrument affecting real property shall grant a certificate of the proof or acknowledgment.

(b)

The court or officer shall cause the certificate of the proof or acknowledgment to be endorsed on the instrument affecting real property.

(c)

The certificate of the proof or acknowledgment shall be signed by the clerk of the court or by the officer if he or she has a seal of office.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 31, § 16; C. & M. Dig., § 1519; Pope's Dig., § 1828; A.S.A. 1947, § 49-206; Acts 2007, No. 827, § 142.

Publisher's Notes.

Rev. Stat., ch. 31, § 16, is also codified as §16-47-105.

18-12-206. Manner of making acknowledgment — Proof of deed or instrument — Proof of identity of grantor or witness.

(a)

The acknowledgment of deeds and instruments of writing for the conveyance of real estate, or whereby such real estate is to be affected in law or equity, shall be by the grantor appearing in person before a court or officer having the authority by law to take the acknowledgment and stating that he or she had executed the deed or instrument for the consideration and purposes therein mentioned and set forth.

(b)

When a deed or instrument referred to in subsection (a) of this section is to be proved, it shall be done by one (1) or more of the subscribing witnesses personally appearing before the proper court or officer and stating on oath that he or she saw the grantor subscribe the deed or instrument of writing or that the grantor acknowledged in his or her presence that he or she had subscribed and executed the deed or instrument for the purposes and consideration therein mentioned, and that he or she had subscribed the deed or instrument as a witness at the request of the grantor.

(c)

If any grantor has not acknowledged the execution of a deed or instrument referred to in subsection (a) of this section and the subscribing witnesses are dead or cannot be had, then the deed or instrument may be proved by the evidence of the handwriting of the grantor and of at least one (1) of the subscribing witnesses. This evidence shall consist of the deposition of two (2) or more disinterested persons, swearing to each signature.

(d)(1)

When any grantor in any deed or instrument that conveys real estate or whereby any real estate may be affected in law or equity, or any witness to any like instrument, shall present himself or herself before any court or other officer for the purpose of acknowledging or proving the execution of the deed or instrument, if the grantor or witness shall be personally unknown to the court or officer, his or her identity and his or her being the person he or she purports to be on the face of such instrument of writing shall be proved to the court or officer.

(2)

Proof may be made by witnesses known to the court or officer or by the affidavit of the grantor or witness if the court or officer shall be satisfied therewith. The proof or affidavit shall also be endorsed on the deed or instrument of writing.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 31, §§ 17-20; C. & M. Dig., §§ 1520-1523; Pope's Dig., §§ 1829, 1830, 1832, 1833; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 49-207 — 49-210.

Publisher's Notes.

Rev. Stat. ch. 31, §§ 17-20, are also codified as §16-47-106.

18-12-207. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning acknowledgment by corporations, was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 999, §
1. The section was derived from Acts 1919, No. 45, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 1526; Pope's Dig., § 1836; A.S.A. 1947, § 49-212.

18-12-208. Defects.

(a)

All deeds, conveyances, deeds of trust, mortgages, marriage contracts, and other instruments in writing affecting or purporting to affect the title to any real estate or personal property situated in this state, which have been recorded and which are defective or ineffectual because:

(1)

Of failure to comply with §18-12-403;

(2)

The officer who certified the acknowledgment or acknowledgments to such instruments omitted any words required by law to be in the certificate or acknowledgments;

(3)

The officer failed or omitted to attach his or her seal to the certificate;

(4)

The officer attached to any such certificate a seal not bearing the words and devices required by law;

(5)

The officer was a mayor of a city or an incorporated town in the State of Arkansas and as such was not authorized to certify to executions and acknowledgments to such instruments, or was the deputy of an official duly authorized by law to take acknowledgments but whose deputy was not so authorized;

(6)

The notary public failed to state the date of the expiration of his or her commission on the certificate of acknowledgment, or incorrectly stated it thereon;

(7)

The officer incorrectly dated the certificate of acknowledgment or failed to state the county wherein the acknowledgment was taken; or

(8)

The acknowledgment was certified in any county of the State of Arkansas by any person holding an unexpired commission as notary public under the laws of the state who had, at the time of the certification, ceased to be a resident of the county within and for which he or she was commissioned, shall be as binding and effectual as though the certificate of acknowledgment or proof of execution was in due form, bore the proper seal, and was certified to by a duly authorized officer.

(b)

A deed, conveyance, deed of trust, mortgage, marriage contract, and other instrument in writing, affecting or purporting to affect the title to any real estate or personal property situated in this state, which is executed after August 13, 1993, shall not be deemed defective or ineffectual because:

(1)

The officer failed or omitted to attach his or her seal to the certificate;

(2)

The officer attached to any such certificate a seal not bearing the words and devices required by law;

(3)

The notary public failed to state the date of the expiration of his or her commission on the certificate of acknowledgment, or incorrectly stated it thereon;

(4)

The officer incorrectly dated the certificate of acknowledgment or failed to state the county wherein the acknowledgment was taken; or

(5)

The acknowledgment was certified in any county of the State of Arkansas by any person holding an unexpired commission as notary public under the laws of the state who had, at the time of the certification, ceased to be a resident of the county within and for which he or she was commissioned.

(c)

A deed, conveyance, deed of trust, mortgage, marriage contract, and any other instrument in writing, affecting or purporting to affect the title to any real estate or personal property situated in this state, whether executed before, on, or after April 8, 2013, shall not be found insufficient to satisfy the requirements of §18-12-202:

(1)

Because the acknowledgment thereof does not strictly comply with the form contained in §16-47-107 or omits the words “for the consideration, uses, and purposes therein mentioned or set forth” or uses similar words;

(2)

Because the gender listed in the acknowledgment thereof does not match the gender of the person acknowledging the instrument;

(3)

Because the acknowledgment thereof does not identify the title or position of the person acknowledging the instrument on behalf of a corporation, partnership, company, trust, association, or other entity; or

(4)

Where a good faith attempt at material compliance with §16-47-107(a), (b), or (c), as applicable, has been made and there is no factual dispute as to the authenticity of the signature of the person making acknowledgement thereof.

(d)

Notwithstanding an acknowledgment to a deed or other instrument which may contain one (1) or more of the defects set forth in this section, if a deed or other instrument is recorded, it shall:

(1)

Provide constructive notice thereafter to all parties of the matters contained in the deed or other instrument; and

(2)

Be treated as any other deed or instrument in writing under §16-47-110, and may be read into evidence in any court in this state without further proof of execution.

(e)

A valid jurat may act as a substitute for a certificate of acknowledgment for instruments recorded on or after April 8, 2013.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 101, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 49-213; Acts 1993, No. 1081, §§ 1, 2; 2013, No. 999, § 4.

Publisher's Notes.

For prior validating acts, see Acts 1873, No. 11, §§ 5, 6, p. 13; Acts 1873, No. 17, §§ 1, 2, p. 25; Acts 1873, No. 41, §§ 1, 2, p. 83; Acts 1883, No. 69, § 6, p. 106; Acts 1883, No. 80, § 1, p. 128; Acts 1885, No. 117, § 1, p. 191; Acts 1893, No. 43, § 1, p. 66; Acts 1893, No. 172, § 1, p. 303; Acts 1895, No. 33, § 1, p. 37; Acts 1897 (Ex. Sess.), No. 21, § 1, p. 58; Acts 1899, No. 56, § 1, p. 107; Acts 1899, No. 175, § 1, p. 313; Acts 1901, No. 41, § 1, p. 79; Acts 1903, No. 87, § 1, p. 150; Acts 1903, No. 87, § 2, p. 150; Acts 1907, No. 147, § 1, p. 354; Acts 1911, No. 24, § 1; Acts 1913, No. 148, § 1; Acts 1915, No. 54, § 1; Acts 1917, No. 142, § 1, p. 765; Acts 1917, No. 142, § 2, p. 765; Acts 1919, No. 333, § 1; Acts 1919, No. 524, § 1; Acts 1923, No. 80, § 1; Acts 1923, No. 185, § 1; Acts 1935, No. 72, § 1; Acts 1937, No. 352, § 1; Acts 1941, No. 422, § 1; Acts 1949, No. 291, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment changed the section heading without markup and added (c), (d), and (e).

18-12-209. Recorded deed or written instrument affecting real estate.

(a)

Every deed or instrument in writing which conveys or affects real estate and which is acknowledged or proved and certified as prescribed by this act may, together with the certificate of acknowledgment, proof, or relinquishment of dower, be recorded by the recorder of the county where such land to be conveyed or affected thereby is located, and when so recorded may be read in evidence in any court in this state without further proof of execution.

(b)

If it appears at any time that any deed or instrument duly acknowledged or proved and recorded as prescribed by this act is lost or not within the power and control of the party wishing to use the deed or instrument, the record thereof, or a transcript of the record certified by the recorder, may be read in evidence without further proof of execution.

(c)

Neither the certificate of acknowledgment nor the probate of any such deed or instrument, nor the record or transcript thereof, shall be conclusive, but it may be rebutted.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 31, §§ 26-28; C. & M. Dig., §§ 1530-1532; Pope's Dig., §§ 1840-1842; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 28-919 — 28-921.

Publisher's Notes.

Rev. Stat., ch. 31, §§ 26-28, are also codified as §16-47-110.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to §18-12-201.

Subchapter 3

— Fee Tail

Preambles.

Acts 1957, No. 163 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the estate tail is a relic of medieval times and seldom desirable in view of the current necessity for credit and for transfer of title incident to the growth of communities, but nevertheless such an estate is often created without a realization of the delay and difficulty imposed on a conveyance of the land involved, which imposition is later sought to be dissolved; and

“Whereas, the common law remedy of fine and common recovery for dissolution of said estates is no longer available as a method dissolving same and a substitute therefore should be provided;

“Now, therefore….”

18-12-301. Considered life estate.

In cases when, by common law, any person may become seized in fee tail of any lands or tenements, by virtue of any devise, gift, grant, or other conveyance, the person, instead of being, or becoming, seized thereof in fee tail, shall be adjudged to be, and become, seized thereof for his or her natural life only. The remainder shall pass in fee simple absolute to the person to whom the estate tail would first pass according to the course of the common law by virtue of the devise, gift, grant, or conveyance.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 31, § 5; C. & M. Dig., § 1499; Pope's Dig., § 1799; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-405.

18-12-302. Dissolution.

(a)(1)

Any estate which under the common law would be deemed an estate tail or a fee tail estate or any estate created by reason of a conveyance to a grantee or grantees and the heirs of his or her body or to other contingent remaindermen may be dissolved by the grantor creating such an estate and all life tenants and all of the other persons then living who might be remaindermen in event of the death of the life tenant or tenants executing a conveyance of the fee.

(2)

The conveyance shall vest in the grantee the fee simple title to the lands therein conveyed.

(b)

The method of extinguishing the estates mentioned in subsection (a) of this section shall apply equally to those estates now in existence and to those which may hereafter come into existence.

(c)

The rights and privileges provided by this section are permissive and cumulative to the rights and remedies now existing under the laws of this state.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 163, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 50-405.1 — 50-405.3.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1957, No. 163, § 4, provided that the act would not affect law suits pending in the courts on the effective date of the act.

18-12-303. Rule in Shelley's Case abolished.

(a)(1)

The Rule in Shelley's Case is abolished and shall not be recognized by any court of this state.

(2)

This section is intended to annul the application or effect of the Rule in Shelley's Case on any instrument or interest in real property.

(b)

When any instrument prepared or executed after July 16, 2003, conveys an interest in any real property to be given to the heirs or issue of any person in words which, under the rule of construction known as the “Rule in Shelley's Case” would have operated to give to that person an interest in fee simple, those words shall operate as words of purchase and not of limitation.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1030, § 1.

Subchapter 4

— Husband and Wife

Cross References.

Married woman's separate property, right of disposition, Ark. Const., Art. 9, § 7.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1887, No. 64, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1919, No. 324, § 2: Mar. 21, 1919. Emergency declared.

Acts 1919, No. 325, § 2: Mar. 21, 1919. Emergency declared.

Acts 1981, No. 714, § 75: Mar. 25, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is declared by the General Assembly of Arkansas that existing law relating to such matters as homestead, dower, curtesy, statutory allowances payable from a decedent's estate, and the right of a surviving spouse to take against the will of a decedent, do not in all circumstances provide for equal treatment between the sexes, that the constitutionality of such existing law has been drawn into question by decisions of the United States Supreme Court and the Arkansas Supreme Court, and that there is an urgent need to insure that the law provides equality in the property rights and interests of married persons. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”